California statutes. Public Utilities Code
(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 497, Sec. 168.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 185 of Ch. 497.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Retirement Board [95860. - 95863.]

95860.

The board shall create a retirement board of not more than five members, at least two members of which shall be the elected representatives of the employees, to administer the retirement system, and shall define its powers and duties and the tenure of the members.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1835.)
-------------------------------------------

95861.

All members of the retirement board shall serve without pay.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1835.)
-------------------------------------------

95862.

The retirement board shall determine the eligibility of officers, employees, and their dependents to participation in the system and shall be the sole authority and judge under such ordinances as may be adopted by the board as to the conditions under which persons may be admitted to and continue to receive benefits of any sort under the retirement system, and may modify allowances for service and disability. The determination of the retirement board shall be final and conclusive and shall not be modified or set aside except for fraud or abuse of discretion.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1835.)
-------------------------------------------

95863.

If the district maintains its own retirement fund the retirement board shall have exclusive control of the administration, investment, and disbursement of such fund. Investment of the fund shall be subject to the terms, conditions, limitations, and restrictions imposed by the laws of this state upon savings banks in the making of investments by savings banks, and cash may be deposited in any licensed national bank or banks in this state or in any bank, banks, or corporations authorized or licensed to do a banking business and organized under the laws of this state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1835.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Investigation and Penalties [95890. - 95891.]

95890.

At least once in each four-year period after the establishment of the retirement system the board shall cause to be made an actuarial valuation of the assets and liabilities of the retirement fund and upon the basis of such investigation and valuation shall make such revision or change of the rate of contribution, the periods and conditions of service, and amounts of retirement allowances as may be necessary.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1835.)
-------------------------------------------

95891.

Except as herein provided, no member of the board or of the retirement board, nor any member of the retirement system or employee of the district, shall have any interest direct or indirect in the making of any investment or in the gains or profits accruing therefrom, and no such person, directly or indirectly, for himself or as an agent or partner of others, shall borrow any of its funds, nor shall any such person in any manner use the same except to make such current and necessary payments as are authorized by the retirement board, nor shall such a person become an endorser or surety as to, or in any manner an obligor for investments of the retirement
 fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1835.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 6. Powers and Functions of District [96000. - 96230.]



  ARTICLE 1. Corporate Power [96000. - 96002.]

96000.

The district has perpetual succession and may adopt a seal and alter it at pleasure.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1835.)
-------------------------------------------

96001.

The district may sue and be sued, except as otherwise provided by law, in all actions and proceedings, in all courts and tribunals of competent jurisdiction.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1835.)
-------------------------------------------

96002.

The district may exercise the right of eminent domain to take any property necessary or convenient to the exercise of the powers granted in this part. The district, in exercising such power shall, in addition to the damage for the taking, injury, or destruction of property, also pay the cost of removal, reconstruction, or relocation of any structure, railways, mains, pipes, conduits, cables or poles of any public utility or public district which is required to be moved to a new location.

No action in eminent domain to acquire property within any incorporated city or any county shall be commenced unless the legislative body of
 the affected city or county has consented to such acquisition by resolution.

No such taking or acquisition by the district which would involve the abandonment, removal, relocation, or use of property of a railroad corporation, as defined in Section 230 of this code, shall be permitted, unless the Public Utilities Commission, after hearing, shall find and determine that the public interest and necessity require the abandonment, removal, relocation, or use of such property and that such taking or acquisition will not unreasonably impair the ability of the railroad corporation involved to provide safe, adequate, economical, and efficient service.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1176.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Contracts [96030. - 96031.]

96030.

The district may make contracts and enter into stipulations of any nature whatsoever either in connection with eminent domain proceedings or otherwise, including, without limiting the generality of the foregoing, contracts and stipulations to indemnify and save harmless, to employ labor, and to do all acts necessary and convenient for the full exercise of the powers granted in this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1835.)
-------------------------------------------

96031.

No officer or employee of the district shall in any manner be interested, directly or indirectly, in any contract awarded or to be awarded by the board, or in the profits to be derived therefrom contrary to the provisions of Article 4 (commencing with Section 1090), Chapter 1, Division 4, Title 1 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1835.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Property [96090. - 96091.]

96090.

The district may take by grant, purchase, gift, devise or lease, or condemn in proceedings under eminent domain, or otherwise acquire, and hold and enjoy, real and personal property of every kind within or without the district necessary to the full or convenient exercise of its powers. The board may lease, mortgage, sell, or otherwise dispose of any real or personal property within or without the district when in its judgment it is for the best interests of the district so to do.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1835.)
-------------------------------------------

96091.

Whenever the board by resolution determines that any record, map, book, or paper in the possession of the district or any officer or employee thereof is of no further value to the district, the board may authorize its sale, destruction, or other disposition.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1835.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Transit Facilities and Service [96120. - 96130.]

96120.

The district may acquire, construct, own, operate, control or use rights-of-way, rail lines, buslines, stations, platforms, switches, yards, terminals, and any and all other facilities necessary or convenient for transit service within or partly without the district, underground, upon, or above the ground and under, upon, or over public streets or other public ways or waterways, together with all physical structures necessary or convenient for the access of persons and vehicles thereto, and may acquire any interest in or rights to the joint use of any or all of the foregoing; provided, that installations in any street, road or other property devoted to a public use shall
 be subject to consent of the governing body in charge of such public use.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1835.)
-------------------------------------------

96121.

The district may without limitation by any other provisions of this part requiring approval of indebtedness, accept contributions of money, rights-of-way, labor, materials, and any other property for the acquisition, construction, maintenance and operation of transit facilities, and may without limitation by any other provisions of this part enter into any contracts and cooperation with and accept cooperation from the state, or any department, instrumentality, or agency thereof, or any public agency in the acquisition, construction, maintenance, and operation of, and in financing the acquisition, construction, maintenance, and operation of, any such transit
 facilities.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1835.)
-------------------------------------------

96122.

The district shall not interfere with or exercise any control over any transit facilities now or hereafter owned, and operated wholly or partly within the district by any city or public agency, unless by consent of such city or public agency and upon such terms as are mutually agreed upon between the board and such city or public agency.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1835.)
-------------------------------------------

96123.

The district may lease or contract for the use of its transit facilities, or any portion thereof, to any operator, and may provide for subleases by such operator upon such terms and conditions as it deems in the public interest. The word “operator” as used in this section means any city or public agency or any person, firm or private corporation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1835.)
-------------------------------------------

96124.

The district may construct and operate or acquire and operate works and facilities in, under, upon, over, across, or along any street or public highway or any stream, bay or watercourse, or over any of the lands which are the property of the state, to the same extent that such rights and privileges appertaining thereto are granted to municipalities within the state, and to install adequate bus stops, including the painting of curbs, subject to the consent of the governing body in charge of such streets, highways, stream, watercourse or lands.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1835.)
-------------------------------------------

96125.

The district may enter into agreements for the joint use of any property and rights by the district and any city, public agency or public utility operating transit facilities; may enter into agreements with any city, public agency or public utility operating any transit facilities, either wholly or partially within, or without, the district, for the joint use of any property of the district or of such city, public agency or public utility, or the establishment of through routes, joint fares, transfer of passengers or pooling arrangements.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1835.)
-------------------------------------------

96126.

The rates and charges for service furnished pursuant to this part shall be fixed by the board and shall be reasonable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1835.)
-------------------------------------------

96127.

The board of supervisors or the city council of a municipality having territory located within the district may file a request for a hearing before the district board as to the reasonableness of any rates or charges fixed by the district and as to any proposal for fixing the location of facilities by the district. The request shall be in writing and shall state the subject matter on which a hearing is desired.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1835.)
-------------------------------------------

96128.

Upon the filing of a request for hearing as provided in Section 96127 the district board shall fix the time and place for hearing. The time fixed shall not be less than 15 days nor more than 60 days from the date such request is filed. Notice of such hearing shall be given to the county or city requesting such hearing and shall be published by the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1835.)
-------------------------------------------

96129.

At the time fixed for any hearing before the board any board of supervisors or city council eligible to file a request for hearing, not a party to the original request for hearing, may intervene and shall be entitled to be heard and to introduce evidence.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1835.)
-------------------------------------------

96130.

Within 30 days after submission of the case, the board shall render its decision and its decision shall be final.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1835.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Indebtedness [96150. - 96153.]

96150.

The district may borrow money for the purpose of defraying the expenses of the district lawfully incurred after the commencement of the fiscal year, but prior to the time moneys from the tax levy for the fiscal year are received by the district, in a sum which shall not exceed five cents ($0.05) on each one hundred dollars ($100) of assessed valuation of taxable property in the district at the time the moneys are borrowed, and may evidence such borrowing by notes bearing interest at a rate not to exceed 6 percent per annum. The notes shall be payable from the tax levy from the then current fiscal year, which levy shall contain a sum sufficient to provide for the payment
 of the notes and the interest thereon. The form of said notes and the proceedings relating to their issuance and sale, will be governed by the applicable provisions contained in Article 7 (commencing with Section 53820) of Chapter 4 of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1835.)
-------------------------------------------

96151.

The board of directors of a district may, within a period of two years from and after the formation of the district, pursuant to a resolution adopted by it for the purpose, borrow money on certificates of indebtedness, promissory notes, or other evidences of indebtedness, in anticipation of the estimated tax revenue for the following fiscal year, to be repaid within four years from the date of borrowing with interest at a rate not to exceed 6 percent per annum, in order to enable the district to meet all of its necessary initial expenses of organization, construction, acquisition, maintenance, and operation. The total amount of money borrowed and indebtedness incurred
 under this section during this two-year period shall not exceed 50 percent of the total amount of estimated tax revenue as estimated by the county auditor of the county in which the district lies for the following fiscal year.

The form of said notes and the proceedings relating to their issuance and sale, will be governed by the applicable provisions contained in Article 7 (commencing with Section 53820) of Chapter 4 of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1835.)
-------------------------------------------

96152.

The district shall not incur an indebtedness under Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 96400) of this part which in the aggregate exceeds two (2) percent of the assessed value of all the real and personal property within the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1835.)
-------------------------------------------

96153.

The district may accept, without limitation by any other provisions of this part requiring approval of indebtedness, contributions or loans from the United States, this state, or any department, instrumentality, or agency of either thereof, for the purpose of financing the acquisition, construction, maintenance, and operation of transit facilities, and may enter into contracts and cooperate with, and accept cooperation from, the United States, this state, or any department, instrumentality, or agency of either thereof, in the acquisition, construction, maintenance, and operation, and in financing the acquisition, construction, maintenance, and operation of any such
 transit facilities in accordance with any legislation which Congress or the Legislature of the State of California may have heretofore adopted or may hereafter adopt, under which aid, assistance, and cooperation may be furnished by the United States or this state in the acquisition, construction, maintenance, and operation or in financing the acquisition, construction, maintenance and operation of any such transit facilities. The district may do any and all things necessary in order to avail itself of such aid, assistance, and cooperation under any federal or state legislation now or hereafter enacted. Any evidence of indebtedness issued under this section shall constitute a negotiable instrument.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1835.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Investments [96180. - 96192.]

96180.

The district may invest any surplus money in its treasury, including money in any sinking fund, in any of the following:

(a) Its own bonds.

(b) Treasury notes, certificates of indebtedness, bills, bonds of the United States, or any other evidence of indebtedness secured by the full faith and credit of the United States.

(c) Obligations issued pursuant to the Federal Home Loan Bank Act or the National Housing Act.

(d) Treasury notes or bonds of this state, or of any public corporation, municipal corporation, public district, or political subdivision within this state which are legal as security for the deposit of public funds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1835.)
-------------------------------------------

96190.

Such investment may be made by direct purchase of any issue of such bonds, treasury notes, or obligations, or part thereof, at the original sale or by the subsequent purchase of the bonds, treasury notes, or obligations.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1835.)
-------------------------------------------

96191.

Any bonds, treasury notes, or obligations purchased and held as investments by the district may from time to time be sold and the proceeds reinvested in bonds, treasury notes, or obligations as provided in this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1835.)
-------------------------------------------

96192.

Sales of any bonds, treasury notes, or obligations purchased and held by the district shall from time to time be made in season so that the proceeds may be applied to the purposes for which the money with which the bonds, treasury notes, or obligations were originally purchased was placed in the treasury of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1835.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. Taxation [96220. - 96230.]

96220.

The district may levy, and collect or cause to be collected, taxes for any lawful purpose subject to a maximum limit of five cents ($0.05) per one hundred dollars ($100) of assessed value of all real estate and personal property; provided however, the district shall have the further power to levy, collect or cause to be collected, said property taxes to a maximum limit of ten cents ($0.10) if approval is first obtained from the City Council of the City of Santa Barbara and the Board of Supervisors of the County of Santa Barbara.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1835.)
-------------------------------------------

96221.

If, in the opinion of the board, the transit operation revenues will not be sufficient for any and all lawful purposes the board shall levy a tax for such purpose or purposes and fix the amount of money necessary to be raised therefor by taxation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1835.)
-------------------------------------------

96222.

The board shall, in addition to the general tax levy as set forth in Section 96220, levy and collect annually until the district’s bonds are paid, or until there is a sum in the treasury of the district set apart for that purpose to meet all sums coming due for principal and interest on the bonds as they become due a tax sufficient to pay the annual interest on the bonds and such part of the principal thereof as becomes due before the proceeds of a tax levied at the next general tax levy will be available. If the maturity of the indebtedness created by the issue of bonds begins more than one year after the date of the issuance thereof, the tax shall be levied and
 collected annually at the time and in the manner aforesaid, sufficient to pay the interest on the indebtedness as it falls due and to constitute a sinking fund for the payment of the principal on or before maturity.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1835.)
-------------------------------------------

96223.

The board may provide for the assessment, levy, and collection of taxes by the district, including the sale of property to the district for delinquent taxes, with penalties, interest, and cost.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1835.)
-------------------------------------------

96224.

The board shall avail itself of the assessments made by the assessor of the county and of the assessments made by the State Board of Equalization for the county and shall take such assessments as the basis for district taxation and have its taxes collected by the tax collector of the county.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1835.)
-------------------------------------------

96225.

In such case the county auditor shall, on or before the third Monday in August of each year, transmit to the board a statement in writing showing the total value of all property within the district, ascertained from the assessments referred to in Section 96224 as equalized.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1835.)
-------------------------------------------

96226.

The board shall, on or before the first day in September, fix the rate of taxes, designating the number of cents upon each hundred dollars, using as a basis the value of property transmitted to the board by the county auditor, which rate of taxation shall be sufficient to raise the amount previously fixed by the board. These acts by the board shall constitute a valid assessment of the property and a valid levy of the taxes so fixed, but the rate of taxation shall not exceed the limit imposed by this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1835.)
-------------------------------------------

96227.

The board shall immediately after fixing the rate of taxes as above provided transmit to the county auditor of the county a statement of the rate of taxes fixed by the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1835.)
-------------------------------------------

96228.

The district’s taxes so levied shall be collected at the same time and in the same manner as county taxes. When collected the net amount, ascertained as provided in this article, shall be paid to the treasurer of the district, under the general requirements and penalties provided by law for the settlement of other taxes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1835.)
-------------------------------------------

96229.

Whenever any real property has been sold for taxes and has been redeemed, the money paid for redemption shall be apportioned and paid to the district by the county treasurer in the proportion which the tax due to the district bears to the total tax for which the property was sold.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1835.)
-------------------------------------------

96230.

The compensation to be charged by and paid to any county for the performance of services under this article shall be fixed by agreement between the board of supervisors of the county and the board. The compensation shall in no event exceed one-half of 1 percent of all money collected for the district. The compensation collected by the county shall be placed to the credit of the county general fund.

All taxes levied under this part are a lien on the property on which they are levied and shall become a lien at the same time as county taxes. The enforcement of the collection of such taxes shall be in the same manner and by the same
 means provided by law for the enforcement of liens for county taxes, all the provisions of law relating to the enforcement of the latter being made a part of this part so far as applicable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1835.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 7. Bonds [96400. - 96591.]



  ARTICLE 1. Issuance [96400. - 96412.]

96400.

The district may from time to time incur a bonded indebtedness as provided in this chapter to pay the cost of acquiring, constructing, or completing the whole or any portion of any transit facilities, or for acquiring any works, lands, structures, rights, equipment, or other property necessary or convenient to carry out the objects, purposes, or powers of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1835.)
-------------------------------------------

96401.

Whenever the board by resolution passed by vote of two-thirds of all its members determines that the public interest or necessity demands the acquisition, construction, or completion by the district of any transit facilities or any works, lands, structures, rights, equipment, or other property necessary or convenient to carry out the objects, purposes, or powers of the district, the cost of which will be too great to be paid out of the ordinary annual income and revenue of the district, it may at any subsequent meeting of the board provide by ordinance for the submission of the proposition of incurring a bonded indebtedness for the purpose set forth in the resolution to
 the voters of the district at a special bond election held for that purpose.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1835.)
-------------------------------------------

96402.

In lieu of a resolution passed by the board, proceedings for the issuance of bonds for the purposes provided in this chapter may be initiated by petition of the voters of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1835.)
-------------------------------------------

96403.

Whenever any petition signed by voters within the district equal in number to at least 15 percent of the total vote cast at the last general statewide election is presented to the board asking for the acquisition, construction, or completion of the whole or any portion of any transit facilities or for acquiring any works, lands, structures, rights, equipment, or other property necessary or convenient to carry out the objects, purposes, or powers of the district, and also asking that a bonded indebtedness be incurred to pay for the cost thereof, the secretary of the district shall immediately examine and verify the signatures of the petition and certify the result of the
 examination to the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1835.)
-------------------------------------------

96404.

If the required number of signatures is found to be genuine, the secretary shall transmit to the board an authentic copy of the petition without the signatures.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1835.)
-------------------------------------------

96405.

Upon receiving a petition with the certificate of the secretary stating that it contains the required number of signatures, the board shall formulate for submission to the voters of the district at a special bond election called for that purpose the proposition of incurring a bonded indebtedness for the purposes set forth in the petition. In its discretion the board may defer the calling of the election until the next general election to be held in the district in order to consolidate them.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1835.)
-------------------------------------------

96406.

The ordinance calling a special bond election shall fix the date on which the election will be held, and the manner of holding the election and of voting for or against incurring the indebtedness. It shall also recite the objects and purposes for which the indebtedness is proposed to be incurred, the estimated cost of the transit facilities, works, lands, structures, rights, equipment, or other property proposed to be acquired, constructed, or completed, the amount of the principal of the indebtedness to be incurred therefor, and the maximum rate of interest to be paid on the indebtedness, which shall not exceed 6 percent per annum, payable semiannually or annually the
 first year and thereafter semiannually.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1835.)
-------------------------------------------

96407.

Propositions for incurring indebtedness for more than one object or purpose may be submitted at the same election.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1835.)
-------------------------------------------

96408.

Any special bond election may be held separately, or may be consolidated with any other election authorized by law at which the voters of the district may vote. If a special bond election is consolidated with any other election, the provisions of this chapter setting forth the procedure for the calling and holding of the special bond election shall be complied with, except that the ordinance calling the election need not set forth the election precincts, polling places, and officers of election, but may provide that the precincts, polling places, and officers of election shall be the same as those set forth in the ordinance, notice, or other proceedings calling the
 election with which the special bond election is consolidated, and shall refer to the ordinance, notice, or other proceedings by number and title, or by other definite description.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1835.)
-------------------------------------------

96409.

The ordinance shall be published, and no other notice of election need be given.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1835.)
-------------------------------------------

96410.

The board shall comply with Article 3, (commencing with Section 9160) of Chapter 2 of Division 9 of the Elections Code, the provisions of which are applicable to any bond election held pursuant to this article. Wherever the words “county clerk” or “county elections official” appear in the Elections Code the words “secretary of the board” shall be substituted, for the purposes of this article, and wherever the words “board of supervisors” appear in the Elections Code, the words “board of directors” shall be substituted, and wherever the words “district
 attorney or county counsel” appear in the Elections Code, the words “attorney for the district” shall be substituted.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 923, Sec. 205.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

96411.

The votes of two-thirds (23) of all the voters voting on the proposition at the election are required to authorize the issuance of bonds under this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1835.)
-------------------------------------------

96412.

If the proposition submitted at a special bond election fails to receive the requisite number of votes, the board shall not within six months after the election hold another special election for the submission of a proposition of incurring a bonded indebtedness substantially the same as the proposition voted upon at the prior election unless a petition signed by voters within the district equal in number to at least 15 percent of the total vote cast at the last general statewide election is filed with the board, requesting that the proposition, or a proposition substantially the same, be submitted at an election to be called for that purpose.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1835.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Form and Content [96440. - 96443.]

96440.

Bonds authorized by this chapter shall mature serially in amounts to be fixed by the board; except that payment shall begin not later than 10 years from the date thereof and shall be completed in not more than 50 years from that date.

The board may divide any issue of bonds authorized pursuant to this chapter into two or more series, and may fix different dates of issuance and different maturity dates for the bonds of each series. The bonds of each series shall mature serially in amounts to be fixed by the board, and the board shall fix a date not more than 10 years from the date of issuance of each series for the earliest
 maturity of such series, and shall fix a date not more than 50 years from the date of issuance of each series for the final maturity of such series.

Pending the actual issuance or delivery of bonds, a district may issue temporary or interim bonds, certificates, or receipts, of any denomination whatsoever, with or without coupon, and in such form as may be prescribed by the board, to be exchanged for definite bonds when ready for delivery.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1835.)
-------------------------------------------

96441.

The bonds shall be issued in such denominations as the board determines, except that no bonds shall be of a denomination less than one hundred dollars ($100), nor of a greater denomination than one thousand dollars ($1,000) or any multiple thereof, and shall be payable on the day and at the place or places fixed in the bonds, and with interest at the rate specified therein, payable semiannually.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1835.)
-------------------------------------------

96442.

The board may at any time prior to the issuance and sale of any bonds provide for the call and redemption of any or all of the bonds on any interest payment date prior to their fixed maturity at not exceeding the par value and accrued interest plus a premium of not exceeding 5 percent upon the principal amount of the bonds, in which event the call price fixed by the board shall be set forth on the face of the bond. Notice of such redemption shall be published. If there is no newspaper of general circulation printed and published within the district, then the publication shall be made in a newspaper of general circulation printed and published within the county in which
 the district or any part thereof is situated. The first publication shall be at least 30 days prior to the date fixed for the redemption. After the date fixed for such redemption interest on the bonds thereafter shall cease.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1835.)
-------------------------------------------

96443.

The bonds shall be signed by the president of the board or by such officer of the district as the board shall by resolution authorize and designate for that purpose. They shall also be signed by the treasurer, and be countersigned by the secretary. The coupons of the bonds shall be numbered consecutively and be signed by the treasurer. All signatures and countersignatures, except one of the signatures or countersignatures on the bonds, may be printed, lithographed, or engraved. If any officer whose signature or countersignature appears on the bonds or coupons ceases to be such officer before the delivery of the bonds to the purchaser, the signature or countersignature is
 nevertheless valid and sufficient for all purposes as if he had remained in office until the delivery of the bonds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1835.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Issue and Sale [96470. - 96472.]

96470.

The bonds may be issued and sold for not less than their par value, but otherwise as the board determines. Before selling any bonds, or any part thereof, the board shall give notice inviting sealed bids in such manner as the board may prescribe. If satisfactory bids are received, the bonds offered for sale shall be awarded to the highest responsible bidder. If no bids are received, or if the board determines that the bids received are not satisfactory as to price or responsibility of the bidders, the board may reject all bids received, if any, and either again give notice inviting bids or sell the bonds at private sale.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1835.)
-------------------------------------------

96471.

All premiums and accrued interest received on the sale of bonds shall be placed in the fund to be used for the payment of principal of and interest on the bonds. The remainder of the proceeds of the bonds shall be placed in the district treasury to the credit of the proper fund, and shall be used exclusively for the objects or purposes for which the bonds were voted; provided that when such objects and purposes have been accomplished any moneys remaining shall be transferred to the fund to be used for the payment of principal of and interest on the bonds, and that when all principal of and interest on the bonds shall have been paid, any balance of money then remaining
 shall be transferred to the general fund of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1835.)
-------------------------------------------

96472.

In lieu of the immediate levy of a tax to pay the interest or any part thereof on any bonded indebtedness incurred in accordance with this division, the board may in the estimate of the amount of money necessary to be raised by the bonds include a sum sufficient to pay interest on all of the bonds or part thereof during the period of acquisition, construction, or completion, but for no period in excess of five years.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1835.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Refunding [96500. - 96506.]

96500.

Whenever the board by resolution passed by a vote of two-thirds of all its members determines that the refunding of the whole or any portion of the bonded indebtedness will be of advantage to the district the board may refund the bonded indebtedness or any portion thereof and issue refunding bonds of the district therefor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1835.)
-------------------------------------------

96501.

The issuance of refunding bonds shall not be construed as the incurring or increase of an indebtedness within the meaning of this act, and the approval of the voters is not required for the issuance of refunding bonds. The board may provide for the call and redemption of any or all of the bonds on any interest payment date prior to their fixed maturity in the ordinance authorizing the issuance of the refunding bonds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1835.)
-------------------------------------------

96502.

Except as otherwise provided, the provisions of this chapter shall substantially govern as to all matters pertaining to the issuance of refunding bonds, including and without limiting the generality of the foregoing, the form, execution, issuance, maturity, redemption, refunding, validation, the payment of interest from bond funds, and the status of the bonds as investments.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1835.)
-------------------------------------------

96503.

Refunding bonds shall bear interest at a rate not exceeding the interest rate on the refunded bonds, but payment of the refunding bonds shall begin not later than one year from the date thereof and be completed in not more than 40 years from that date.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1835.)
-------------------------------------------

96504.

The proceeds of the sale of refunding bonds shall be applied only to the purchase, or retirement at not more than par and accrued interest, or the call price, of the bonded indebtedness for which the refunding bonds were issued.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1835.)
-------------------------------------------

96505.

In lieu of selling refunding bonds and using the proceeds to purchase or retire the bonds to be refunded, the board may exchange refunding bonds at not less than par and accrued interest for the bonds so refunded.
